District of Columbia statutes.
38-803

Service credit for retirement; deposits.

Service rendered by any person for salary or wages as an employee of any cafeteria or lunchroom operated in the public school buildings of the District during any period prior to the date when such cafeteria or lunchroom is placed under the Office of Central Management shall, if and when such person becomes an employee of the Department of Food Services, be deemed to be service rendered for the government of the District of Columbia for purposes of subchapter III of Chapter 83 of Title 5, United States Code, to be computed in accordance with §§ 8332 and 8333 of Title 5, United States Code; provided, that such person shall make deposits covering such service as provided in § 8334 of Title 5, United States Code ; and provided further, that any such person may elect to make such deposits in installments in accordance with the provisions of § 8334 of Title 5, United States Code .

History

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 368, ch. 448, title I, § 3
Oct. 25, 1951, 65 Stat. 637, ch. 560, § 3
Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 536, ch. 575, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-803.
1973 Ed., § 31-1403.